California statutes. Water Code
(d) California’s water infrastructure continues to age and deteriorate. More than 50 years ago, Californians approved the construction of the State Water Project. In recent decades, however, that infrastructure has proven inadequate to meet California’s growing needs.

(e) This measure provides funding to implement the three objectives of the California Water Action Plan which are more reliable water supplies, the restoration of important species and habitat, and a more resilient and sustainably managed water infrastructure.

(f) Developing and
 guarding our water resources is critical for California to maintain vibrant communities, globally competitive agriculture, and healthy ecosystems.

(g) Encouraging water conservation and recycling are commonsense methods to make more efficient use of existing water supplies.

(h) Sustainable water management in California depends upon reducing and reversing overdraft and water quality impairment of groundwater basins. Investments to expand groundwater storage and reduce and reverse overdraft and water quality impairment of groundwater basins provide extraordinary public benefit and are in the public interest.

(i) Protecting lakes, rivers, and streams, cleaning up polluted groundwater supplies, and preserving water sources that supply the entire state are crucial to providing a reliable supply of water and protecting
 the state’s natural resources.

(j) The Water Quality, Supply, and Infrastructure Improvement Act of 2014 provides a comprehensive and fiscally responsible approach for addressing the varied challenges facing California’s water resources.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Definitions [79702. - 79702.]

79702.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this section govern the construction of this division, as follows:

(a) “Acquisition” means obtaining a fee interest or any other interest in real property, including easements, leases, water, water rights, or interest in water obtained for the purposes of instream flows and development rights.

(b) “CALFED Bay-Delta Program” means the program described in the Record of Decision dated August 28, 2000.

(c) “Commission” means the California Water Commission.

(d) “Committee” means the Water Quality, Supply, and Infrastructure Improvement Finance Committee created by Section 79787.

(e) “Delta” means the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta, as defined in Section 85058.

(f) “Delta conveyance facilities” means facilities that convey water directly from the Sacramento River to the State Water Project or the federal Central Valley Project pumping facilities in the south Delta.

(g) “Delta counties” means the Counties of Contra Costa, Sacramento, San Joaquin, Solano, and Yolo.

(h) “Delta plan” has the meaning set forth in Section 85059.

(i) “Director”
 means the Director of Water Resources.

(j) “Disadvantaged community” has the meaning set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 79505.5, as it may be amended.

(k) “Economically distressed area” means a municipality with a population of 20,000 persons or less, a rural county, or a reasonably isolated and divisible segment of a larger municipality where the segment of the population is 20,000 persons or less, with an annual median household income that is less than 85 percent of the statewide median household income, and with one or more of the following conditions as determined by the department:

(1) Financial hardship.

(2) Unemployment rate at least 2
 percent higher than the statewide average.

(3) Low population density.

(l) “Fund” means the Water Quality, Supply, and Infrastructure Improvement Fund of 2014 created by Section 79715.

(m) “Instream flows” means a specific streamflow, measured in cubic feet per second, at a particular location for a defined time, and typically follows seasonal variations.

(n) “Integrated regional water management plan” has the meaning set forth in Part 2.2 (commencing with Section 10530) of Division 6, as that part may be amended.

(o) “Long-term” means for a period of not less than 20 years.

(p) “Nonprofit organization” means an organization qualified to do business in California and qualified under Section 501(c)(3) of Title 26 of the United States Code.

(q) “Proposition 1E” means the Disaster Preparedness and Flood Prevention Bond Act of 2006 (Chapter 1.699 (commencing with Section 5096.800) of Division 5 of the Public Resources Code).

(r) “Proposition 84” means the Safe Drinking Water, Water Quality and Supply, Flood Control, River and Coastal Protection Bond Act of 2006 (Division 43 (commencing with Section 75001) of the Public Resources Code).

(s) “Public agency” means a state agency or department, special district, joint powers authority,
 city, county, city and county, or other political subdivision of the state.

(t) “Rainwater” has the meaning set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 10573.

(u) “Secretary” means the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency.

(v) “Severely disadvantaged community” has the meaning set forth in Section 116760.20 of the Health and Safety Code.

(w) “Small community water system” means a community water system that serves no more than 3,300 service connections or a year-long population of no more than 10,000 persons.

(x) “State board” means the State Water Resources Control Board.

(y) “State General Obligation Bond Law” means the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(z) “State small water system” has the meaning set forth in subdivision (n) of Section 116275 of the Health and Safety Code.

(aa) “Stormwater” has the meaning set forth in subdivision (e) of Section 10573.

(ab) “Water right” means a legal entitlement authorizing water to be diverted from a specified source and put to a beneficial, nonwasteful use.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 673, Sec. 38.   (AB 1531)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, and approved in Prop. 1 on Nov. 4, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. General Provisions [79703. - 79716.5.]

79703.

An amount that equals not more than 5 percent of the funds allocated for a grant program pursuant to this division may be used to pay the administrative costs of that program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79704.

Unless otherwise specified, up to 10 percent of funds allocated for each program funded by this division may be expended for planning and monitoring necessary for the successful design, selection, and implementation of the projects authorized under that program. This section shall not otherwise restrict funds ordinarily used by an agency for “preliminary plans,” “working drawings,” and “construction” as defined in the annual Budget Act for a capital outlay project or grant project. Water
 quality monitoring data shall be collected and reported to the state board in a manner that is compatible and consistent with surface water monitoring data systems or groundwater monitoring data systems administered by the state board. Watershed monitoring data shall be collected and reported to the Department of Conservation in a manner that is compatible and consistent with the statewide watershed program administered by the Department of Conservation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79705.

Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to the development or implementation of programs or projects authorized or funded under this division other than Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 79750).

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79706.

(a) Prior to disbursing grants or loans pursuant to this division, each state agency that receives an appropriation from the funding made available by this division to administer a competitive grant or loan program under this division shall develop and adopt project solicitation and evaluation guidelines. The guidelines shall include monitoring and reporting requirements and may include a limitation on the dollar amount of grants or loans to be awarded. If the state
 agency has previously developed and adopted project solicitation and evaluation guidelines that comply with the requirements of this subdivision, it may use those guidelines.

(b) Prior to disbursing grants or loans, the state agency shall conduct three public meetings to consider public comments prior to finalizing the guidelines. The state agency shall publish the draft solicitation and evaluation guidelines on its Internet Web site at least 30 days before the public meetings. One meeting shall be conducted at a location in northern California, one meeting shall be conducted at a location in the central valley of California, and one meeting shall be conducted at a location in southern California. Upon adoption, the state agency shall transmit copies of the guidelines to the fiscal committees and the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79707.

It is the intent of the people that:

(a) The investment of public funds pursuant to this division will result in public benefits that address the most critical statewide needs and priorities for public funding.

(b) In the appropriation and expenditure of funding authorized by this division, priority will be given to projects that leverage private, federal, or
 local funding or produce the greatest public benefit.

(c) A funded project advances the purposes of the chapter from which the project received funding.

(d) In making decisions regarding water resources, state and local water agencies will use the best available science to inform those decisions.

(e) Special consideration will be given to projects that employ new or innovative technology or practices, including decision support tools that support the integration of multiple jurisdictions, including, but not limited to, water supply, flood control, land use, and sanitation.

(f) Evaluation of projects considered for funding pursuant to this division will include review by professionals in the fields relevant to the proposed project.

(g) To the extent practicable, a project supported by funds made available by this division will include signage informing the public that the project received funds from the Water Quality, Supply, and Infrastructure Improvement Act of 2014.

(h) Projects funded with proceeds from this division will be consistent with Division 7 (commencing with Section 13000) of this code and Section 13100 of the Government Code.

(i) Projects funded with proceeds from this division will promote state planning priorities consistent with the provisions of Section 65041.1 of the Government Code and sustainable communities strategies consistent with the provisions of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 65080 of the Government Code, to the extent feasible. 

(j) California’s working agricultural and forested landscapes will be preserved wherever possible. To the extent feasible, watershed objectives included in this division should be achieved through use of conservation easements and voluntary landowner participation, including, but not limited to, the use of easements pursuant to Division 10.2 (commencing with Section 10200) and Division 10.4 (commencing with Section 10330) of the Public Resources Code and voluntary habitat credit exchange mechanisms.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79708.

(a) The Department of Finance shall provide for an independent audit of expenditures pursuant to this division. The secretary shall publish a list of all program and project expenditures pursuant to this division not less than annually, in written form, and shall post an electronic form of the list on the Natural Resources Agency’s Internet Web site.

(b) If an audit, required by statute, of any entity
 that receives funding authorized by this division is conducted pursuant to state law and reveals any impropriety, the California State Auditor or the Controller may conduct a full audit of any or all of the activities of that entity.

(c) The state agency issuing any grant or loan with funding authorized by this division shall require adequate reporting of the expenditures of the funding from the grant or loan.

(d) Prior to soliciting projects pursuant to this division, state agencies shall submit guidelines to the secretary. The secretary shall verify that the guidelines are consistent with applicable statutes and for all the purposes enumerated in this division. The secretary shall post an electronic form of the guidelines submitted by state agencies and the subsequent verifications on the Natural Resources Agency’s Internet Web site.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79708.5.

In addition to the information required pursuant to Section 79708, in order to facilitate oversight of funding and projects, the secretary shall post on the Natural Resources Agency’s Internet Web site information on changes to project timelines and project spending.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 27, Sec. 19.   (SB 88)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

79709.

(a) Funds expended pursuant to this division for the acquisition of a permanent dedication of water shall be in accordance with Section 1707 where the state board specifies that the water is in addition to water that is required for regulatory requirements as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 1707. The expenditure of funds provided by this division may include the initiation of the dedication as a short term or temporary urgency change, that is approved in
 accordance with Section 1707 and either Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 1435) of, or Chapter 10.5 (commencing with Section 1725) of, Part 2 of Division 2, during the period required to prepare any environmental documentation and for approval of permanent dedication.

(b) Funds expended pursuant to this division for the acquisition of long-term transfers of water shall be transfers in accordance with Sections 1735, 1736, and 1737 if the state board, after providing notice and opportunity for a hearing, approves such a petition. Funds expended pursuant to this division shall prioritize permanent transfers. Long-term transfers shall be for a period of not less than 20 years, except for any water transfers for the benefit of subsection (d) of Section 3406 of the Central Valley Project Improvement Act (Title 34 of Public Law 102-575).

(c) Funds expended pursuant to this division
 for any acquisition of water shall only be done pursuant to this section and shall only be used for projects that will provide fisheries or ecosystem benefits or improvements that are greater than required applicable environmental mitigation measures or compliance obligations in effect at the time the funds from this division are made available for the project and funds shall not be credited to any measures or obligations, except for any water transfers for the benefit of subsection (d) of Section 3406 of the Central Valley Project Improvement Act (Title 34 of Public Law 102-575).

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79710.

(a) Funds provided by this division shall not be expended to pay the costs of the design, construction, operation, mitigation, or maintenance of Delta conveyance facilities. Those costs shall be the responsibility of the water agencies that benefit from the design, construction, operation, mitigation, or maintenance of those facilities.

(b) To the extent feasible, in implementing subdivision (k) of
 Section 79731, the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Conservancy shall seek to achieve wildlife conservation objectives through projects on public lands or voluntary projects on private lands. Funds available to the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Conservancy pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 79731 may be used, in consultation with the Department of Fish and Wildlife, for payments to landowners for the creation of measurable habitat improvements or other improvements to the condition of endangered or threatened species. The Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Conservancy may develop and implement a competitive program for habitat enhancements that maximizes voluntary landowner participation in projects that provide measurable and long-lasting habitat or species improvements in the Delta. These funds shall not be used to subsidize or decrease the mitigation obligations of any party. 

(c) In implementing subdivision (k) of Section 79731, the Sacramento-San
 Joaquin Delta Conservancy shall coordinate and consult with the city or county in which a grant is proposed to be expended or an interest in real property is proposed to be acquired and with the Delta Protection Commission. Acquisitions by the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Conservancy pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 79731 shall be from willing sellers only.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79711.

(a) This division does not diminish, impair, or otherwise affect in any manner whatsoever any area of origin, watershed of origin, county of origin, or any other water rights protections, including, but not limited to, rights to water appropriated prior to December 19, 1914, provided under the law. This division does not limit or affect the application of Article 1.7 (commencing with Section 1215) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 2, Sections 10505, 10505.5, 11128,
 11460, 11461, 11462, and 11463, and Sections 12200 to 12220, inclusive. 

(b) For the purposes of this division, an area that utilizes water that has been diverted and conveyed from the Sacramento River hydrologic region, for use outside the Sacramento River hydrologic region or the Delta, shall not be deemed to be immediately adjacent thereto or capable of being conveniently supplied with water therefrom by virtue or on account of the diversion and conveyance of that water through facilities that may be constructed for that purpose after January 1, 2014.

(c) Nothing in this division supersedes, limits, or otherwise modifies the applicability of Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 1700) of Part 2 of Division 2, including petitions related to any new conveyance constructed or operated in accordance with Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 85320) of Part 4 of Division 35.

(d) Unless otherwise expressly provided, nothing in this division supersedes, reduces, or otherwise affects existing legal protections, both procedural and substantive, relating to the state board’s regulation of diversion and use of water, including, but not limited to, water right priorities, the protection provided to municipal interests by Sections 106 and 106.5, and changes in water rights. Nothing in this division expands or otherwise alters the state board’s existing authority to regulate the diversion and use of water or the courts’ existing concurrent jurisdiction over California water rights.

(e) Nothing in this division shall be construed to affect the California Wild and Scenic Rivers Act (Chapter 1.4 (commencing with Section 5093.50) of Division 5 of the Public Resources Code) or the federal Wild and Scenic Rivers Act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1271 et seq.) and funds authorized
 pursuant to this division shall not be available for any project that could have an adverse effect on the values upon which a wild and scenic river or any other river is afforded protections pursuant to the California Wild and Scenic Rivers Act or the federal Wild and Scenic Rivers Act.

(f) Nothing in this division supersedes, limits, or otherwise modifies the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Reform Act of 2009 (Division 35 (commencing with Section 85000)) or any other applicable law, including, but not limited to, Division 22.3 (commencing with Section 32300) of the Public Resources Code.

(g) Funds provided by this division shall not be used to acquire land via eminent domain.

(h) Notwithstanding any other law, any agency acquiring land pursuant to this division may use the Natural Heritage Preservation Tax Credit Act
 of 2000 (Division 28 (commencing with Section 37000) of the Public Resources Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79712.

(a) Eligible applicants under this division are public agencies, nonprofit organizations, public utilities, federally recognized Indian tribes, state Indian tribes listed on the Native American Heritage Commission’s California Tribal Consultation List, and mutual water companies.

(b) (1) To be eligible for funding under this division, a project proposed by a public utility that is
 regulated by the Public Utilities Commission or a mutual water company shall have a clear and definite public purpose and shall benefit the customers of the water system and not the investors.

(2) To be eligible for funding under this division, an urban water supplier shall adopt and submit an urban water management plan in accordance with the Urban Water Management Planning Act (Part 2.6 (commencing with Section 10610) of Division 6).

(3) To be eligible for funding under this division, an agricultural water supplier shall adopt and submit an agricultural water management plan in accordance with the Agricultural Water Management Planning Act (Part 2.8 (commencing with Section 10800) of Division 6).

(4) In accordance with Section 10608.56, an agricultural water supplier or an urban water supplier is ineligible for
 funding under this division unless it complies with the requirements of Part 2.55 (commencing with Section 10608) of Division 6.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79713.

The Legislature may enact legislation necessary to implement programs funded by this division, except as otherwise provided in Section 79760.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79714.

(a) Unless otherwise specified, any state agency that has the statutory authority to implement one or more of the purposes specified in this bond may be eligible for appropriations from the funding made available by this division.

(b) Funding made available by this division shall not be appropriated by the Legislature to a specific project.

(c) Projects funded pursuant to this division may use the services of the California Conservation Corps or certified community conservation corps, as defined in Section 14507.5 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79715.

The proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to this division shall be deposited in the Water Quality, Supply, and Infrastructure Improvement Fund of 2014, which is hereby created in the State Treasury.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79716.

Each state agency that receives an appropriation of funding made available by this division shall be responsible for establishing metrics of success and reporting the status of projects and all uses of the funding on the state’s bond accountability Internet Web site, as provided by statute.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79716.5.

Each state agency that receives an appropriation of funding made available by this division shall do the following:

(a) Evaluate the outcomes of projects funded by this division.

(b) Include in the agency’s reporting pursuant to Section 79716 the evaluation described in subdivision (a).

(c) Hold a grantee of funds accountable for completing projects funded by this division on time and within scope.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 27, Sec. 20.   (SB 88)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Clean, Safe and Reliable Drinking Water [79720. - 79726.]

79720.

The sum of five hundred twenty million dollars ($520,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature from the fund, for expenditures, grants, and loans for projects that improve water quality or help provide clean, safe, and reliable drinking water to all Californians.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79721.

The projects eligible for funding pursuant to this chapter shall help improve water quality for a beneficial use. The purposes of this chapter are to:

(a) Reduce contaminants in drinking water supplies regardless of the source of the water or the contamination.

(b) Assess and prioritize the risk of contamination to drinking water supplies.

(c) Address the critical and immediate needs of disadvantaged, rural, or small communities that suffer from contaminated drinking water supplies, including, but not limited to, projects that address a public health emergency.

(d) Leverage other private, federal, state, and local drinking water quality and wastewater treatment funds.

(e) Reduce contaminants in discharges to, and improve the quality of, waters of the state.

(f) Prevent further contamination of drinking water supplies.

(g) Provide disadvantaged communities with public drinking water infrastructure that provides clean, safe, and reliable drinking water supplies that the community can sustain over the long term.

(h) Ensure access to clean, safe, reliable, and affordable drinking water for California’s communities.

(i) Meet primary and secondary safe drinking water standards or remove contaminants identified by the state or federal government for development of a primary or secondary drinking water standard.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79722.

The contaminants that may be addressed with funding pursuant to this chapter may include, but shall not be limited to, nitrates, perchlorate, MTBE (methyl tertiary butyl ether), arsenic, selenium, hexavalent chromium, mercury, PCE (perchloroethylene), TCE (trichloroethylene), DCE (dichloroethene), DCA (dichloroethane), 1,2,3-TCP (trichloropropane), carbon tetrachloride, 1,4-dioxane, 1,4-dioxacyclohexane, nitrosodimethylamine, bromide, iron, manganese, and uranium.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79723.

Of the funds authorized by Section 79720, two hundred sixty million dollars ($260,000,000) shall be available for deposit in the State Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund Small Community Grant Fund created pursuant to Section 13477.6 for grants for wastewater treatment projects. Priority shall be given to projects that serve disadvantaged communities and severely disadvantaged communities, and to projects that address public health hazards. Projects may include, but not be limited to,
 projects that identify, plan, design, and implement regional mechanisms to consolidate wastewater systems or provide affordable treatment technologies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79724.

(a) (1) Of the funds authorized by Section 79720, two hundred sixty million dollars ($260,000,000) shall be available for grants and loans for public water system infrastructure improvements and related actions to meet safe drinking water standards, ensure affordable drinking water, or both. Priority shall be given to projects that provide treatment for contamination or access to an alternate drinking water source or sources for small community
 water systems or state small water systems in disadvantaged communities whose drinking water source is impaired by chemical and nitrate contaminants and other health hazards identified by the state board. Eligible recipients serve disadvantaged communities and are public water systems or public agencies. The state board may make grants for the purpose of financing feasibility studies and to meet the eligibility requirements for a construction grant. Eligible expenses may include initial operation and maintenance costs for systems serving disadvantaged communities. Priority shall be given to projects that provide shared solutions for multiple communities, at least one of which is a disadvantaged community that lacks safe, affordable drinking water and is served by a small community water system, state small water system, or a private well. Construction grants shall be limited to five million dollars ($5,000,000) per project, except that the state board may set a limit of not more than twenty million dollars
 ($20,000,000) for projects that provide regional benefits or are shared among multiple entities, at least one of which shall be a small disadvantaged community. Not more than 25 percent of a grant may be awarded in advance of actual expenditures.

(2) For the purposes of this subdivision, “initial operation and maintenance costs” means those initial, eligible, and reimbursable costs under a construction funding agreement that are incurred up to, and including, initial startup testing of the constructed project in order to deem the project complete. Initial operation and maintenance costs are eligible to receive funding pursuant to this section for a period not to exceed two years. 

(b) The administering entity may expend up to twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) of the funds allocated in subdivision (a) for technical assistance to eligible communities.

(c) The state board shall deposit up to two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) of the funds available pursuant to this section into the Drinking Water Capital Reserve Fund, which is hereby created in the State Treasury. Moneys in the Drinking Water Capital Reserve Fund shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, and shall be administered by the state board for the purpose of serving as matching funds for disadvantaged communities. The state board shall develop criteria to implement this subdivision.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79725.

(a) For the purposes of awarding funding under this chapter, a local cost share of not less than 50 percent of the total costs of the project shall be required. The cost-sharing requirement may be waived or reduced for projects that directly benefit a disadvantaged community or an economically distressed area.

(b) At least 10 percent of the funds available pursuant to this chapter shall be allocated for
 projects serving severely disadvantaged communities.

(c) Up to 15 percent of the funds available pursuant to this chapter may be allocated for technical assistance to disadvantaged communities. The agency administering this funding shall operate a multidisciplinary technical assistance program for small and disadvantaged communities.

(d) Funding for planning activities, including technical assistance, to benefit disadvantaged communities may exceed 15 percent of the funds allocated, subject to the determination of the need for additional planning funding by the state agency administering the funding.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79726.

For the purpose of providing the state share needed to leverage federal funds to assist communities in providing safe drinking water, any funds appropriated for the purposes of Section 79724 shall be available for deposit in the Safe Drinking Water State Revolving Fund, created by Section 116760.30 of the Health and Safety Code, prior to expenditure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 673, Sec. 39.   (AB 1531)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Protecting Rivers, Lakes, Streams, Coastal Waters, and Watersheds [79730. - 79738.]

79730.

The sum of one billion four hundred ninety-five million dollars ($1,495,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature from the fund, in accordance with this chapter, for competitive grants for multibenefit ecosystem and watershed protection and restoration projects in accordance with statewide priorities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79731.

Of the funds authorized by Section 79730, the sum of three hundred twenty-seven million five hundred thousand dollars ($327,500,000) shall be allocated for multibenefit water quality, water supply, and watershed protection and restoration projects for the watersheds of the state in accordance with the following schedule:

(a) Baldwin Hills Conservancy, ten million dollars ($10,000,000).

(b) California Tahoe Conservancy, fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000).

(c) Coachella Valley Mountains Conservancy, ten million dollars ($10,000,000).

(d) Ocean Protection Council, thirty million dollars ($30,000,000).

(e) San Diego River Conservancy, seventeen million dollars ($17,000,000).

(f) San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy, thirty million dollars ($30,000,000).

(g) San Joaquin River Conservancy, ten million dollars ($10,000,000).

(h) Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy, thirty million dollars ($30,000,000).

(i) Sierra Nevada Conservancy, twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000).

(j) State Coastal Conservancy, one hundred million five hundred thousand dollars ($100,500,000). Eligible watersheds for the funds allocated pursuant to this subdivision include, but are not limited to, those that are in the San Francisco Bay Conservancy region, the Santa Ana River watershed, the Tijuana River watershed, the Otay River watershed, Catalina Island, and the central coast region.

(k) Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Conservancy, fifty million dollars ($50,000,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79732.

(a) In protecting and restoring California rivers, lakes, streams, and watersheds, the purposes of this chapter are to:

(1) Protect and increase the economic benefits arising from healthy watersheds, fishery resources, and instream flow.

(2) Implement watershed adaptation projects in order to reduce the impacts of climate change on
 California’s communities and ecosystems.

(3) Restore river parkways throughout the state, including, but not limited to, projects pursuant to the California River Parkways Act of 2004 (Chapter 3.8 (commencing with Section 5750) of Division 5 of the Public Resources Code), in the Urban Streams Restoration Program established pursuant to Section 7048, and urban river greenways.

(4) Protect and restore aquatic, wetland, and migratory bird ecosystems, including fish and wildlife corridors and the acquisition of water rights for instream flow.

(5) Fulfill the obligations of the State of California in complying with the terms of multiparty settlement agreements related to water resources.

(6) Remove barriers to fish passage.

(7) Collaborate with federal agencies in the protection of fish native to California and wetlands in the central valley of California.

(8) Implement fuel treatment projects to reduce wildfire risks, protect watersheds tributary to water storage facilities, and promote watershed health.

(9) Protect and restore rural and urban watershed health to improve watershed storage capacity, forest health, protection of life and property, stormwater resource management, and greenhouse gas reduction.

(10) Protect and restore coastal watersheds, including, but not limited to, bays, marine estuaries, and nearshore ecosystems.

(11) Reduce pollution or contamination of rivers, lakes, streams, or coastal
 waters, prevent and remediate mercury contamination from legacy mines, and protect or restore natural system functions that contribute to water supply, water quality, or flood management.

(12) Assist in the recovery of endangered, threatened, or migratory species by improving watershed health, instream flows, fish passage, coastal or inland wetland restoration, or other means, such as natural community conservation plan and habitat conservation plan implementation.

(13) Assist in water-related agricultural sustainability projects.

(b) Funds provided by this chapter shall only be used for projects that will provide fisheries or ecosystem benefits or improvements that are greater than required applicable environmental mitigation measures or compliance obligations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79733.

Of the funds made available by Section 79730, the sum of two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) shall be administered by the Wildlife Conservation Board for projects that result in enhanced stream flows.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79734.

For restoration and ecosystem protection projects under this chapter, the services of the California Conservation Corps or a local conservation corps certified by the California Conservation Corps shall be used whenever feasible.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79735.
